Hawaii, session 2025, HB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii has experienced rising air temperatures, with annual peak averages consistently breaking record highs.  These increases, along with Hawaii's high average annual relative humidity, pose significant challenges for human thermoregulation. The legislature further finds that exercising in hot and humid weather can be dangerous, as the body's ability to cool itself through sweating becomes less effective under humid conditions.  When sweat cannot evaporate efficiently due to high moisture levels in the air, the risk of heat-related illnesses increases. The legislature also finds that children and younger athletes are particularly vulnerable to exertional heat illness due to slower heat acclimatization, reduced thermoregulation capabilities compared to adults, and external pressures from coaches and parents to exceed their physical limits. Additionally, children often lack control over the timing and conditions of outdoor activities, such as recess and sports practices, and may have limited access to hydration during these activities. The legislature further finds that shade can significantly reduce the risk of heat-related illnesses by providing cooler spaces for students to exercise, train, and play.  Expanding shaded areas on school campuses and properties is critical for creating safer environments during outdoor activities.  Additionally, identifying and developing areas on campuses to increase shade access is an essential strategy for protecting children from dangerous levels of heat. The legislature also finds that wet-bulb globe temperature measurements are the gold standard for assessing heat stress, as adopted by organizations such as the United States military, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, National Collegiate Athletic Association, and professional sports leagues.  Wet-bulb globe thermometers are also relatively affordable for schools and athletic departments to acquire and use, making them a practical tool for ensuring safer outdoor activities. Despite these known challenges and expected increasing temperatures, Hawaii currently lacks statewide guidelines for managing extreme heat during outdoor recreational activities, leaving children at risk of preventable heat-related illnesses.  Therefore, purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require and appropriate funds for the department of education, in collaboration with the department of health, to develop statewide guidelines related to managing heat exposure to protect students' health during outdoor activities; and (2)  Appropriate funds for wet-bulb globe temperature thermometers for all public and charter schools statewide. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Guidelines for outdoor activities during extreme heat.  (a)  The department, in collaboration with the department of health, shall develop statewide guidelines for managing heat exposure to protect students' health during outdoor activities.  These guidelines shall: (1)  Apply to all public and charter schools in the State; (2)  Be utilized for sports practices, conditioning workouts, recess, marching band practice, junior reserve officers' training corps activities, and other outdoor activities; (3)  Be based on wet-bulb globe temperature as the standard for measuring heat stress; and (4)  Include recommendations for expanding shaded areas on campuses to provide cooler environments for exercise, training, and play. (b)  The guidelines shall include: (1)  Thresholds for modifying, postponing, or canceling outdoor activities based on wet-bulb glob temperature measurements; (2)  Protocols for ensuring adequate hydration during outdoor activities; (3)  Training for school staff on recognizing and responding to symptoms of exertional heat illness; (4)  Measures to safeguard students with medical conditions or medications that impair thermoregulation; (5)  Recommendations for acclimatizing or reacclimatizing students returning to outdoor activities after a period of absence; and (6)  Recommendations for schools to identify and develop areas on campuses to expand shade access as a strategy to improve outdoor safety and reduce heat exposure." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $20,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of education to develop the recommendations for the guidelines pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $20,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of education to provide wet-bulb globe temperature thermometers to all public and charter schools statewide. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________